Utah statutes.
73-1-12.   Failure to record -- Effect.

Every deed of a water right which shall not be recorded as provided in this title shall be void as against any subsequent purchaser, in good faith and for a valuable consideration, of the same water right, or any portion thereof, where his own deed shall be first duly recorded.



No Change Since 1953

